nl: Breinaald punt stijl: Afgerond/stomp; Scherp (kant); Speciaal (microtip); Standaard; Anders
vi: Kiểu đầu kim đan: Tròn/tù; Nhọn (đan ren); Chuyên dụng (đầu kim siêu nhỏ); Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
lt-LT: Mezgimo virbalų galiuko stilius: Suapvalintas / bukas; Smailus (nėriniams); Specialus (mikro antgalis); Standartinis; Kita
tr: “Örgü şişi uç stili: Yuvarlak/küt; Keskin (dantel); Özel (mikro uç); Standart; Diğer
ja: 編み針先スタイル: 丸み/鈍角; シャープ (レース用); 特殊 (マイクロチップ); スタンダード; その他
it: Stile della punta dell'ago da maglia: Arrotondata/smussata; Affilata (pizzo); Speciale (micropunta); Standard; Altro
da: Typen af spids på strikkepinden: Afrundet/sløv; Skarp (knipling); Specialitet (mikrospids); Standard; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de ponta da agulha de tricô: Arredondada/romba; Afiada (renda); Especialidade (micro-ponta); Padrão; Outro
cs: Styl hrotu pletací jehlice: Zaoblený/tupý; Ostrý (krajkový); Speciální (mikrohrot); Standardní; Jiné
ko: 뜨개바늘 끝 모양: 라운드/블런트; 샤프(레이스); 특수(마이크로 팁); 표준형; 기타
hu: Kötőtűhegy kialakítása: Lekerekített / tompa; Hegyes (csipke); Speciális (mikrohegyű); Szabványos; Egyéb
sk-SK: Štýl špičky pletacej ihlice: Zaoblený/tupý; Ostrý (čipka); Špeciálny (mikrohrot); Štandardný; Iné
zh-CN: 针织针尖样式: 圆头/钝头; 尖头（蕾丝）; 特殊（微尖）; 标准; 其他
el: Στυλ μύτης βελόνας πλεξίματος: Στρογγυλεμένη/αμβλεία; Αιχμηρή (δαντέλα); Ειδική (μικροαιχμή); Βασική; Άλλο
bg-BG: Стил на върха на иглата за плетене: Заоблен/тъп; Остър (за ажур); Специален (микро връх); Стандартен; Друго
fi: Neulepuikon kärjen tyyli: Pyöristetty/tylppä; Terävä (pitsi); Erikoisneula (mikrokärki); Vakio; Muu
ro-RO: Stilul vârfului acului de tricotat: Rotunjit/bont; Ascuțit (dantelă); Special (micro-vârf); Standard; Altele
zh-TW: 編織針針尖樣式: 圓頭/鈍頭; 尖頭 (蕾絲); 特殊 (微尖頭); 標準; 其他
pt-BR: Estilo da ponta da agulha de tricô: Arredondada/romba; Afiada (renda); Especialidade (microponta); Padrão; Outra
sv: Sticknålens spetsstil: Rundad/trubbig; Skarp (spets); Special (mikrospets); Standard; Övrigt
es: Tipo de punta de la aguja de tejer: Redondeada/roma; Afilada (encaje); Especialidad (micropunta); Estándar; Otro
pl: Styl końcówki drutu dziewiarskiego: Zaokrąglona/tępa; Ostra (do koronek); Specjalistyczna (mikrokońcówka); Standardowa; Inna
de: Stil der Stricknadelspitze: Abgerundet/stumpf; Spitz (Lace); Spezial (Mikro-Spitze); Standard; Sonstige
nb: Stil på strikkepinnen: Avrundet/butt; Skarp (blonde); Spesial (mikrospiss); Standard; Annet
th: สไตล์ปลายเข็มถัก: หัวมน/หัวป้าน; หัวแหลม (งานลูกไม้); หัวพิเศษ (ไมโครทิป); มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
fr: Forme de la pointe d’aiguille à tricoter: Arrondi/bout rond; Pointu (dentelle); Spécialité (micro-pointe); Standard; Autre
sl-SI: Slog konice pletilne igle: Zaokroženo/topo; Ostro (čipkasto); Specialno (mikro konica); Standardno; Drugo
en: Knitting needle tip style: Rounded/blunt; Sharp (lace); Specialty (micro-tip); Standard; Other
ru: Стиль кончика вязальной спицы: Закругленный/тупой; Острый (ажурный); Специальный (микронаконечник); Стандартный; Другое
hr-HR: Stil vrha igle za pletenje: Zaobljeno/tupo; Oštro (čipka); Specijalno (mikrovrh); Standardno; Ostalo